Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 2

General Sessions Judges Conference

17-3-201. Creation — Membership.

There is created the Tennessee general sessions judges conference, which shall be the official organization of the general sessions judges in this state.

The membership of the conference shall consist of all judges of general sessions courts in the state.

Acts 1970, ch. 399, § 1; T.C.A., § 17-601.

17-3-202. Adoption of rules — Bylaws — Officers.

The Tennessee general sessions judges conference is authorized to adopt and, from time to time, amend rules, regulations or bylaws that it considers necessary for the conduct of its affairs. The rules, regulations or bylaws may provide for officers that the conference considers advisable, for the method of selection of the officers, for the selection of a time and place within the state for annual meetings of the conference, and for other matters consistent with the general laws of the state that the conference chooses.

Acts 1970, ch. 399, § 2; T.C.A., § 17-602.

17-3-203. Annual meeting.

The conference shall meet annually for the consideration of any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its members, to the end that there shall be a more efficient and prompt administration of justice in the general sessions courts of this state.

Acts 1970, ch. 399, § 3; T.C.A., § 17-603.

17-3-204. Duty to attend — Expenses.

It is the official duty of each member of the conference to attend the annual meeting unless unable to do so because of physical incapacity.

Each member shall be compensated for the member's actual expenses in attending the annual meeting. The expenses shall be paid upon a verified statement of expenses being filed with the county mayor by any member incurring the expenses. Expenses shall be paid by the trustee upon warrant of the county mayor from the general fund of the county in which the member serves as judge.

Acts 1970, ch. 399, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 17-604; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.